src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/acro_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# Testing of case marking of acronyms. Lexicon ACRO_cons gives -av, -aj, -an, etc, while ACRO_vow gives -v, -j, -n, etc.

Tests:

  Acronym - NAF: # ACRO_cons
     NAF+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Sg+Nom: NAF
     NAF+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Sg+Gen: NAF:a
     NAF+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Sg+Acc: NAF:av
     NAF+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Sg+Ine: NAF:an
     NAF+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Sg+Ill: NAF:aj
     NAF+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Sg+Ela: NAF:as
     NAF+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Sg+Com: NAF:ajn
     NAF+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Ess: NAF:an
     NAF+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Pl+Nom: NAF:a
     NAF+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Pl+Gen: NAF:aj
     NAF+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Pl+Acc: NAF:ajt
     NAF+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Pl+Ine: NAF:ajn
     NAF+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Pl+Ill: NAF:ajda
     NAF+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Pl+Ela: NAF:ajs
     NAF+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Pl+Com: NAF:aj

  Acronym - SUPU: # ACRO_vow
     SUPU+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Sg+Nom: SUPU   
     SUPU+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Sg+Gen: SUPU 
     SUPU+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Sg+Acc: SUPU:v
     SUPU+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Sg+Ine: SUPU:n
     SUPU+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Sg+Ill: SUPU:j
     SUPU+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Sg+Ela: SUPU:s
     SUPU+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Sg+Com: SUPU:jn
     SUPU+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Ess: SUPU:n
     SUPU+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Pl+Nom: SUPU 
     SUPU+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Pl+Gen: SUPU:j
     SUPU+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Pl+Acc: SUPU:jt
     SUPU+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Pl+Ine: SUPU:jn
     SUPU+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Pl+Ill: SUPU:jda
     SUPU+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Pl+Ela: SUPU:js
     SUPU+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Pl+Com: SUPU:j

  Acronym - NASO: # dynamically generated
     NASO+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Dyn+Sg+Nom: NASO   
     NASO+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Dyn+Sg+Gen: NASO 
     NASO+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Dyn+Sg+Acc: NASO:v
     NASO+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Dyn+Sg+Ine: NASO:n
     NASO+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Dyn+Sg+Ill: NASO:j
     NASO+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Dyn+Sg+Ela: NASO:s
     NASO+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Dyn+Sg+Com: NASO:jn
     NASO+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Dyn+Ess: NASO:n
     NASO+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Dyn+Pl+Nom: NASO 
     NASO+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Dyn+Pl+Gen: NASO:j
     NASO+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Dyn+Pl+Acc: NASO:jt
     NASO+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Dyn+Pl+Ine: NASO:jn
     NASO+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Dyn+Pl+Ill: NASO:jda
     NASO+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Dyn+Pl+Ela: NASO:js
     NASO+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Dyn+Pl+Com: NASO:j

  Acronym - BRB: # dynamically generated
     BRB+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Dyn+Sg+Nom: BRB
     BRB+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Dyn+Sg+Gen: BRB:a
     BRB+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Dyn+Sg+Acc: BRB:av
     BRB+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Dyn+Sg+Ine: BRB:an
     BRB+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Dyn+Sg+Ill: BRB:aj
     BRB+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Dyn+Sg+Ela: BRB:as
     BRB+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Dyn+Sg+Com: BRB:ajn
     BRB+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Dyn+Ess: BRB:an
     BRB+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Dyn+Pl+Nom: BRB:a
     BRB+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Dyn+Pl+Gen: BRB:aj
     BRB+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Dyn+Pl+Acc: BRB:ajt
     BRB+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Dyn+Pl+Ine: BRB:ajn
     BRB+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Dyn+Pl+Ill: BRB:ajda
     BRB+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Dyn+Pl+Ela: BRB:ajs
     BRB+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Dyn+Pl+Com: BRB:aj

  Acronym - BRB: # dynamically generated
     SÁMÁS+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Sg+Nom: SÁMÁS
     SÁMÁS+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Sg+Gen: SÁMÁS:a
     SÁMÁS+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Sg+Acc: SÁMÁS:av
     SÁMÁS+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Sg+Ine: SÁMÁS:in
     SÁMÁS+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Sg+Ill: SÁMÁS:ij
     SÁMÁS+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Sg+Ela: SÁMÁS:is
     SÁMÁS+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Sg+Com: SÁMÁS:ijn
     SÁMÁS+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Ess: SÁMÁS:in
     SÁMÁS+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Pl+Nom: SÁMÁS:a
     SÁMÁS+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Pl+Gen: SÁMÁS:ij
     SÁMÁS+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Pl+Acc: SÁMÁS:ijt
     SÁMÁS+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Pl+Ine: SÁMÁS:ijn
     SÁMÁS+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Pl+Ill: SÁMÁS:ijda
     SÁMÁS+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Pl+Ela: SÁMÁS:ijs
     SÁMÁS+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Pl+Com: SÁMÁS:ij
     
